Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 214

Transaction of Business Outside Tennessee

48-214-101. Transaction of business outside Tennessee.

Transaction of Business Outside Tennessee. By enacting chapters 201-248 of this title the general assembly recognizes the LLC as an important and constructive form of business organization. The general assembly understands that:

Businesses organized under chapters 201-248 of this title will often transact business in other states;

For businesses organized under chapters 201-248 of this title to function effectively and for such chapters to be a useful enactment, such chapters must be accorded the same comity and full faith and credit that states typically accord to each other's corporate laws; and

Specifically, it is essential that other states recognize both the legal existence of limited liability companies formed under chapters 201-248 of this title and the legal status of all members of these limited liability companies.

The general assembly, therefore, specifically seeks that, subject to any reasonable registration requirements, other states extend to chapters 201-248 of this title the same full faith and credit under article IV, section 1 of the United States Constitution, and the same comity, that Tennessee extends to statutes that other states enact to provide for the establishment and operation of business organizations.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Key Tax Aspects of the Tennessee Limited Liability Company Act (Andrhe Sophia Blumstein), 30 Tenn. B.J. 14 (1994).

48-214-102. Governing law.

The liability of a member, holders of financial interest, governor, employee, or agent of a limited liability company formed and existing under chapters 201-248 of this title shall at all times be governed by chapters 201-248 of this title and the laws of this state.

If a conflict arises between the laws of this state and the laws of any other jurisdiction with regard to the liability of a member, holder of financial interest, governor, employee, or agent of a limited liability company formed and existing under chapters 201-248 of this title for the debts, obligations and liabilities of the limited liability company, or for the acts or omissions of another member, holder of financial interest, governor, employee or agent of the limited liability company, chapters 201-248 of this title and the laws of this state shall govern in determining such liability.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.